Utah statutes.
31A-37a-501.   Suspension and revocation.
(1) (a)  The commissioner shall notify a special purpose financial captive
insurance company not less than 30 days before suspending or revoking the
special purpose financial captive insurance company's certificate of authority
pursuant to Section 31A-37-505.
(b)  In the notice required by Subsection (1)(a) the commissioner shall state
the basis for the suspension or revocation.
(c)  The commissioner shall give a special purpose financial captive insurance
company described in this Subsection (1) an opportunity for a hearing pursuant
to Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.
(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1) and Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative
Procedures Act, the commissioner is not required to provide prior notice or a
hearing if the grounds for suspension or revocation of a special purpose
financial captive insurance company's certificate of authority pursuant to
Section 31A-37-505 relate primarily to:
(a)  the financial condition or soundness of the special purpose financial
captive insurance company; or
(b)  a deficiency in the assets of the special purpose financial captive
insurance company.
